Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 676.110 is amended to read:
676.110. (1) An individual practicing a health care profession may not use the  title “doctor” in
connection with the profession, unless the individual:
(a) Has earned a doctoral degree in the individual’s field of practice; and
(b)(A) Is licensed by a health  professional regulatory board to practice the particular health
care profession in which the individual’s doctoral degree was earned; or
(B) Is working under a  board-approved residency contract and is practicing under the license
of a supervisor who is licensed by [ a] the health professional  regulatory board to practice the par-
ticular health care profession in which the individual’s doctoral degree was earned.
[(2) If an  individual uses the title “doctor” in connection with a health care profession at any time,
the individual must designate the health care profession in which the individual’s  doctoral degree was
earned on all written or printed matter, advertising, billboards, signs or  professional notices used in
connection with the  health care profession, regardless of whether the individual’s name or the title
“doctor” appears on the written or printed matter, advertising, billboard, sign or professional  notice.
The designation must be in  letters or print at least one-fourth the size of the largest letters used on the
written or printed matter,  advertising, billboard, sign or professional notice, and in material, color, type
or illumination to give display and legibility of at least one-fourth that of  the largest letters used on the
written or printed matter, advertising, billboard, sign or professional notice. ]
(2)(a) As used in this subsection, “material” means electronic or printed matter, social
media, advertising, billboards, signs, professional notices and professional name badges.
(b) An individual who uses  the title “doctor” in connection with the health care profes-
sion the individual practices shall designate the health care profession in which the individual
earned a doctoral degree on all material used in connection with the health  care profession.
The designation must:
(A) Be  in letters or print at least one-fourth the size of the largest letters or print used
on the material; and
(B) Be in color, type, illumination or matter so as to give display and legibility of  at least
one-fourth that of the largest letters used on the material.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit:
(a) A chiropractic  physician licensed under ORS chapter 684 from using the title “chiropractic
physician”;
Enrolled House Bill 3912 (HB 3912-INTRO) Page 1
(b) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS  chapter 685 from using the title “naturopathic
physician”;
(c) A person licensed to practice optometry under ORS chapter  683 from using the title “doctor
of optometry” or “optometric physician”; or
(d) A physician  licensed under ORS 677.805 to 677.840 from using the title “podiatric
physician.”
Passed by House April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3912 (HB 3912-INTRO) Page 2